Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 18 Depositions

9-18-1.
Officials authorized to take depositions.

Any justice of the supreme or superior or family court, justice of the peace, or notary public may take the deposition of any witness to be used in the trial of any civil suit, action, petition, or proceeding in which he or she is not interested, nor counsel, nor the attorney of either party, and which shall then be commenced or pending in this state, or in any other state, or in the District of Columbia, or in any territory, government, or country.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 374; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 539, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

19-18-1

; P.L. 1966, ch. 1, § 9; P.L. 1979, ch. 373, § 7.

Parties to Proceedings.

A party cannot require the adverse party to give his deposition prior to the trial. Tilden-Thurber Corp. v. Farnell,

43 R.I. 42

, 110 A. 399,

1920 R.I. LEXIS 36

(1920).

Tenants who were plaintiffs in action against landlord for losses from fire could not be summoned by landlord to give deposition in another action by fellow tenant for losses from same fire. Hamilton Co. v. Goring,

65 R.I. 459

, 16 A.2d 334,

1940 R.I. LEXIS 141

(1940).

A party may obtain a commission to take his own deposition. Rabinowitz v. Bayliss,

76 R.I. 479

, 72 A.2d 668,

1950 R.I. LEXIS 26

(1950).

9-18-2.
Notice to adverse party.

Previous to the taking of any deposition within this state, the official authorized to take the deposition shall, in all cases, cause the adverse party or his or her attorney of record to be notified in writing of the time and place appointed for taking the depositions, so that he or she may attend and put interrogatories to the deponent if he or she think fit; provided, that if the person to be notified cannot be found and his or her residence is not known and he or she has no attorney of record, the moving party or his or her attorney may make affidavit of such facts before any justice of the superior court at any time, and thereupon the justice shall prescribe the method in which notice shall be given to the person.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 375; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 539, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-18-2

.

9-18-3.
Address and time of service of notice.

The notification issued by the magistrate, officer, or commissioner who shall take the deposition shall be directed to any proper officer, or to any impartial or disinterested person, and shall be served a reasonable time, not less than twenty-four (24) hours, exclusive of Sundays and legal holidays, before the time of taking the deposition.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 376; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 539, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

9-18-3

.

9-18-4.
Service and return of notice.

The officer or other person charged with the service of the notification shall serve the notification by reading it to the party to be cited, if to be found; and if not to be found, by leaving a copy thereof at his or her usual place of abode; and shall, in his or her return, state the manner and time of the service; and whenever the service shall be made by any person other than a sworn officer, he or she shall verify the return, under oath, before some officer authorized to administer oaths.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 377; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 539, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

9-18-4

.

9-18-5.
Manner of taking depositions outside state for use in state.

Depositions may be taken without this state to be used in the tribunals of this state, upon written notice conforming to the applicable rules of procedure, and shall be taken in the manner and with the formalities required by the law of this state or the state, district, territory, or country in which the deposition shall be taken; or shall be taken, if taken in any other state, district, or territory of the United States, before a commissioner appointed by the governor of this state, or before a judge, chancellor, justice of the peace, notary public, or civil magistrate of the state, district, or territory, respectively, or, if taken out of the United States, before a resident official of the United States, or, if the deponent is in the military, air, or naval service of the United States, before a colonel, lieutenant colonel, or major in the army or air force, or before any officer in the navy not below the grade and rank of lieutenant commander. And in every such case under the second method, the party causing the depositions to be taken shall notify the adverse party, or his or her attorney of record, of the time and place appointed for taking the deposition; and the notification issued by the official before whom the deposition is to be taken shall be served, in the manner as provided in §

9-18-4

, such reasonable time before the taking of the deposition as will give the adverse party a full opportunity to be present in person or by attorney and put interrogatories to the deponent, if he or she thinks fit.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 378; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 539, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

9-18-5

; P.L. 1989, ch. 81, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 69.

9-18-6.
Oath of deponent — Reduction of deposition to writing.

Every person, before deposing, shall be sworn to testify the truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the truth, and after giving the deposition shall subscribe his or her name thereto, if taken in longhand in the presence of the official before whom the deposition was taken. The deposition may be reduced to writing by the official or by any person, including the deponent, under his or her direction and in his or her presence, or may be reduced to writing stenographically either by the official or by some person in his or her presence and under his or her direction, sworn by the official to correctly take down in shorthand, the evidence as given; and in the latter case, a transcript thereof in longhand writing, typewriting, print, or other reproduction, sworn to by the person stenographically reporting the deposition and signed by the deponent, shall be received in evidence. The signature in the latter case shall be attested by the official taking the deposition or by some magistrate authorized to administer oaths whether in this state or elsewhere.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 379; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 539, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

9-18-6

.

9-18-7.
Sealing and delivery to court.

The deposition, once taken, shall be retained by the magistrate, officer, or commissioner until he or she delivers the deposition with his or her own hand to the court for which it is taken, or shall, together with a certificate of its having been duly taken, be by the magistrate, officer, or commissioner, sealed up and directed to such court and delivered to the clerk thereof, and remain so sealed until opened by order of the court or of some justice thereof, or by the clerk with the consent of the parties; and any person may be compelled to appear and depose as provided in this chapter within this state, in the same manner as to appear and testify in court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 380; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 539, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

9-18-7

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 83.

9-18-8.
Deposition as evidence — Use of certified copy.

The deposition of any person taken pursuant to this chapter may be used as evidence in the trial of any judicial proceeding in any court, or town council, or before commissioners, masters in chancery, referees, or auditors, in which it shall have been taken to be used; and if the party who took the deposition shall neglect to produce or use it, the adverse party may use the original or a copy of the deposition, certified by the magistrate before whom it was taken.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 381; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 539, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

9-18-8

.

Parties Against Whom Used.

Deposition taken in trial of probate appeal could not be used in subsequent proceeding for construction of the will against a party who was not a party to the probate proceeding. Woodworth v. Baker,

48 R.I. 99

, 135 A. 606,

1927 R.I. LEXIS 18

(1927).

9-18-9.
Court grant of commission to take deposition.

Any court may, on the motion of either party in any action, suit, or proceeding, civil or criminal, pending therein, in which a deposition may be used, or before any commissioners, referees, or auditors appointed by any such court or under a rule from it, grant a commission to take depositions according to law, whenever it may be necessary to prevent a failure or delay of justice, on such terms as such court, by general or special order, may direct; and the deposition, so taken, may be used in any state of the cause, on appeal or otherwise.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 382; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 539, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

9-18-9

.

9-18-10.
Time of taking deposition.

Depositions may be taken as provided in this chapter at any time; provided, however, that no deposition to be used in a jury trial shall be taken during the progress of the trial, except upon order of the justice presiding.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 383; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 31; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 539, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

9-18-10

.

9-18-11.
Depositions for use in foreign tribunals.

Depositions may be taken in this state to be used on the trial of any cause pending in a tribunal of any other state, district, territory, or country, pursuant to chapter 18.1 of this title.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 384; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 32; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 32; G.L. 1938, ch. 539, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

9-18-11

; P.L. 2019, ch. 190, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 241, § 2.

9-18-12.
Petition for perpetuation of testimony — Designation of person to take deposition.

Any person, desirous of perpetuating the testimony of any witness concerning any matter which is or may be the subject of litigation, as well before as after litigation is commenced, may present a petition in writing to any justice of the supreme or superior or family court, or to any justice of a district court, setting forth the reasons of his or her application, the name of the witness or witnesses, the subject matter of the controversy, and the names of all persons known to be interested therein, and praying that the deposition of the witness or witnesses may be taken; and thereupon if the justice be satisfied of the reasonableness of the petition, he or she shall designate some notary public or standing master in chancery to take the deposition, to whom the petition, with the order of designation thereon, shall be sent.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 385; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 33; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 33; G.L. 1938, ch. 539, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

9-18-12

; P.L. 1979, ch. 373, § 7.

9-18-13.
Manner of taking deposition in perpetual memory.

The same formalities shall be observed as to notice, and the same methods may be employed, in the taking of depositions in perpetual memory as in the taking of other depositions, and the officer taking the deposition shall have the same power and authority as magistrates taking other depositions to compel any person to appeal and depose as provided in this chapter, within this state, in the same manner as to appear and testify in court. In case any person who is entitled to notice of the taking of the deposition shall be or reside outside of this state, the notice may be served by any disinterested person, and such other notice shall be given as the justice to whom the petition was presented may order.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 387; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 35; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 35; G.L. 1938, ch. 539, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

9-18-13

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 69.

9-18-14.
Delivery and recording of deposition in perpetual memory.

The officer taking the deposition shall seal up and direct the deposition, together with the petition therefor, to the clerk of the superior court for the county in which some one of the persons notified of the taking of the deposition shall reside, or if no one of the persons so notified shall reside in this state, then the court for the county in which the person preferring the petition shall reside, and in case no one of the persons notified nor the person preferring the petition shall reside in this state, then in Providence county. The clerk shall, on receiving the deposition and petition, so directed and sealed up, on payment of legal fees for recording as in other cases, open and record the deposition and petition and the certificate of the taking of the deposition, in a book to be specifically kept for that purpose, noting on the deposition the time when he or she received it and the page of the book in which it is recorded, after which he or she shall deliver the deposition and petition to the party preferring the petition; and no deposition not so recorded shall be received as evidence in any court in the state, unless the deposition shall be opened in court at the time of the hearing of the cause in which it is used.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 388; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 36; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 36; G.L. 1938, ch. 539, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

9-18-14

.

9-18-15.
Admissibility of deposition taken to perpetuate testimony.

The deposition, in case of the death of any deponent, his or her of unsound mind, his or her absence from this state, or inability to attend, may be used as evidence in any court in this state against any person who shall have had due notice of the taking of the deposition, his or her heirs, executors, or administrators.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 386; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 34; G.L. 1938, ch. 539, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

9-18-15

.

9-18-16.
Use in bastardy cases.

Depositions taken in conformity to the provisions of this chapter may be used in the trial of any bastardy case.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 393; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 41; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 41; G.L. 1938, ch. 539, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

9-18-16

.